Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-212
Act, how cited.

Sections 86-212 to 86-235 shall be known and may be cited as the Telemarketing and Prize Promotions Act.

Laws 1999, LB 469, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 165, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,2001, § 86-2001;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 74.